src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-20vaeitsj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - väitś: # Noun (20) väitś 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     väitś+N+Sg+Nom: väitś
     väitś+N+Sg+Gen: väidse
     väitś+N+Sg+Par: väist
     väitś+N+Sg+Ill: väiste
     väitś+N+Sg+Ine: väidsen
     väitś+N+Sg+Ela: väidsest
     väitś+N+Sg+All: väidsele
     väitś+N+Sg+Ade: väidsel
     väitś+N+Sg+Abl: väidselt
     väitś+N+Sg+Tra: väidses
     väitś+N+Sg+Ter: väidseniq
     väitś+N+Sg+Abe: väidseldäq
     väitś+N+Sg+Com: väidsegaq
     väitś+N+Pl+Nom: väidseq
     väitś+N+Pl+Gen: väitsi
     väitś+N+Pl+Par: väitsi
     väitś+N+Pl+Ill: väitsihe
     väitś+N+Pl+Ine: väidsin
     väitś+N+Pl+Ela: väidsist
     väitś+N+Pl+All: väidsile
     väitś+N+Pl+Ade: väidsil
     väitś+N+Pl+Abl: väidsilt
     väitś+N+Pl+Tra: väidsis
     väitś+N+Pl+Ter: väidsiniq
     väitś+N+Pl+Abe: väidsildäq
     väitś+N+Pl+Com: väitsigaq
